Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.030

District fiscal year.

Beginning September 1, 1977 the fiscal year for all school districts shall be September 1 through August 31.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.65.410.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.